Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Legislative Mandates Regarding Cities’ Spending and Taxation

6.945.
Restriction of General Assembly’s authority to require cities to make expenditures or levy taxes.

The General Assembly shall not impose requirements on cities of any class that require city expenditures or tax levies unless:

The requirements are fully funded by the General Assembly; or

The requirements are contingent on the approval of the city legislative body.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply if the requirements are the result of a federal mandate, but in no case shall the requirements described in this section extend beyond the requirements of the federal mandate.

Nothing in this section shall affect the obligations under KRS

6.955

to

6.975

,

78.510

to

78.852

, or any other retirement system or plan established by Kentucky law.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 204, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.